Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 1 Property

29-3-1.
“Personal property” defined; natural guardian or next friend must qualify as conservator; exception.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “personal property” does not include the value of property that is held for the minor’s benefit in trust or by a custodian under Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, “The Georgia Transfers to Minors Act.”

The natural guardian or next friend of a minor may not receive the personal property of the minor until the natural guardian or next friend becomes the legally qualified conservator of the minor; provided, however, that when the total value of all personal property of the minor is $25,000.00 or less, the natural guardian may receive and shall thereafter hold and use all or part of the personal property for the benefit of the minor and shall be accountable for the personal property but shall not be required to become the legally qualified conservator as to that personal property.

Upon receiving an affidavit:

That the value of all the personal property of a minor will not exceed $25,000.00 in value;

That no conservator has been appointed for the minor’s estate; and

That the affiant is the natural guardian of the minor, any person indebted to or holding personal property of the minor shall be authorized to pay the amount of the indebtedness or to deliver the personal property to the affiant. In the same manner and upon like proof, any person having the responsibility for the issuance or transfer of stocks, bonds, or other personal property shall be authorized to issue or transfer the stocks, bonds, or personal property to or in the name of the affiant. Upon such payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance pursuant to the affidavit, the person shall be released to the same extent as if the payment, delivery, transfer, or issuance had been made to the legally qualified conservator of the minor and shall not be required to see to the application or disposition of the personal property.

This Code section shall not authorize a temporary, testamentary, or permanent guardian to receive personal property of the minor unless the guardian becomes the legally qualified conservator of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 1/HB 620.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, inserted “the term” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “or next friend” twice; and substituted “$25,000.00” for “$15,000.00” in subsection (b) and in paragraph (c)(1).

Cross references.

Parent and child relationship generally, §

19-7-1

et seq.

Circumstances justifying removal of child from parental custody, §

19-7-4

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Trusts for Dependents: Effect of Georgia’s Support Obligation on Federal Income Taxation,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 323 (1972).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

29-3-2.
Release of debtor when collection doubtful.

The natural guardian of a minor who has no conservator may release the debtor and compromise a debt when the collection of the debt is doubtful without becoming the conservator of the minor and without such action being approved by the court if the amount of the debt is not more than $25,000.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 2/HB 620.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, substituted “not more than $25,000.00” for “$15,000.00 or less” at the end of this Code section.

29-3-3.
Definitions; compromise of claim; settlement.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Gross settlement” means the present value of all amounts paid or to be paid in settlement of a minor’s claim, including cash, expenses of litigation, attorney’s fees, and any amounts allocated to a structured settlement or other similar financial arrangement. Such term shall include the total amount paid or to be paid on behalf of all settling parties.

“Net settlement” means the gross settlement reduced by:

Attorney’s fees, expenses of litigation, and legally enforceable liens against the settlement that are to be paid from the settlement proceeds;

The present value of amounts to be received by the minor after reaching the age of majority; and

The present value of amounts to be placed into a trust that the probate court or court in which the action is pending approves or creates for the benefit of the minor.

If the minor has a conservator, the only person who can compromise a minor’s claim is the conservator.

If the proposed gross settlement of a minor’s claim is $25,000.00 or less, the natural guardian of the minor, without becoming the conservator of the minor and without any court approval:

If the proposed gross settlement of a minor’s claim is more than $25,000.00, and the net settlement is $25,000.00 or less:

The settlement shall be submitted for approval to:

The probate court if no legal action has been initiated, or

The court in which the legal action is pending if legal action has been initiated, and such court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to approve the settlement, except as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section;

No conservator shall be required to compromise the claim; and

No conservator shall be required to receive payment of the settlement; provided, however, that the natural guardian receiving payment of the settlement shall thereafter hold and use the settlement for the benefit of the minor and shall be accountable for the same as provided in Code Section 29-3-1.

If the proposed gross settlement of a minor’s claim is more than $25,000.00, and the net settlement is more than $25,000.00:

A conservator shall be required to compromise the claim;

A conservator shall be required to receive payment of the settlement and shall thereafter hold and use the settlement for the benefit of the minor and shall be accountable for the same as provided in Code Section 29-3-1; and

Such conservator shall submit the settlement for approval to:

The probate court if no legal action has been initiated, or

The court in which the legal action is pending if legal action has been initiated, and such court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to approve the settlement, except as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section.

If an order of approval is obtained from the probate court or a court in which legal action is pending, based upon the best interest of the minor, the natural guardian, next friend, or conservator shall be authorized, subject to Code Section 29-3-22, to compromise any contested or doubtful claim in favor of the minor without receiving consideration for such compromise as a lump sum.

Without limiting the foregoing, the compromise may:

Involve a structured settlement or creation of a trust on terms that the probate court or court in which the action is pending approves or creates, including, but not limited to, funding; and

Be in exchange for:

The resolution of the action; or

An arrangement that defers:

Receipt of part, not to exceed a total distribution of $25,000.00 prior to a minor reaching the age of majority; or

All of the consideration for the compromise until after the minor reaches the age of majority.

Any settlement entered consistent with the provisions of this Code section shall be final and binding upon all parties, including the minor.

It shall be within the discretion of the court in which the action is pending to hold a hearing on compliance with the requirements of this Code section; provided, however, that a hearing shall not be required if compliance with such requirements is evident from the record.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section to the contrary, where a settlement has been submitted to a court for approval, an action shall not be voluntarily dismissed pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 9-11-41, or otherwise dismissed upon motion, except upon order of the court in which the action is pending and upon the terms and conditions as that court deems proper.

If specifically indicated in the dismissal order, or if a settlement is reached while the case is pending in the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court, the trial court shall retain exclusive jurisdiction to approve any settlement.

If legal action has been initiated but is no longer pending, and the trial court has not specifically retained jurisdiction pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, then any settlement approved by the court in which the legal action is pending as required by subsection (c) of this Code section, shall instead be submitted for approval to the probate court.

(A)

May compromise the claim; or

(B)

May receive payment of and shall thereafter hold and use the settlement for the benefit of the minor and shall be accountable for the same as provided in Code Section 29-3-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 5/SB 534; Ga. L. 2008, p. 715, § 6/SB 508; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 3/HB 620.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, rewrote this Code section.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-3-4.
Disqualifications of conservator.

No person may be appointed or continue to serve as conservator of a minor who:

Is a minor, a ward, or a protected person; or

Has a conflict of interest with the minor unless the court determines that the conflict of interest is insubstantial or that the appointment clearly would be in the minor’s best interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-5.
Nomination of testamentary conservator; no notice, bond, or security required; rights, powers, and duties.

Every parent, by will, may nominate a testamentary conservator for the parent’s minor child for the property that passes to the minor under the parent’s will.

Upon probate of the will, letters of conservatorship shall be issued to the individual nominated in the parent’s will who shall serve as testamentary conservator without notice or hearing.

A testamentary conservator shall not be required to give bond and security on the property that passes to the minor under the parent’s will, except in the case of waste committed or apprehended, in which case the court may require a bond and security. If the testamentary conservator fails to give bond as required, the court may dismiss the conservator and appoint another conservator. If property accrues or has accrued to the minor from sources other than the parent’s will, the court may appoint a different conservator for such property or may appoint the testamentary conservator for such property and require the testamentary conservator to give bond for the property thus accruing.

In all other respects a testamentary conservator shall have the same rights, powers, and duties as other conservators appointed by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Cross references.

Disability of minors with regard to disposal of property generally, §

1-2-8

.

Amount of bond required from guardian of property in probate proceedings, § 53-7-34 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

29-3-6.
Power to appoint conservator.

The court of the county in which a minor is found or in which the proposed conservator is domiciled shall have the power to appoint a conservator for the minor.

If a nonresident minor has property in this state, the judge of the court of the county in which the property is located may appoint a conservator who shall have control only over such property.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 6/SB 534.

Cross references.

Jurisdiction of courts to appoint guardian of child, §

15-11-6

.

Appointment of guardian ad litem in probate proceedings, § 53-3-19 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Provision that surviving spouse under 18 years may take share of estate without intervention of guardian, § 53-4-2(3) (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For article, “Trusts for Dependents: Effect of Georgia’s Support Obligation on Federal Income Taxation,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 323 (1972).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-3-7.
Preference among individuals for appointment of conservator; court’s ability to ignore preference for best interest of minor.

The court shall appoint as conservator that person who shall best serve the interest of the minor considering the following order of preferences:

The individual who is the preference of a minor who is 14 years of age or older;

The nearest adult relative of the minor as set forth in Code Section 53-2-1;

Other adult relatives of the minor;

Other adults who are related to the minor by marriage;

A person who was designated in writing by a minor’s natural guardian in a notarized document or document witnessed by two or more persons;

A person who has provided care or support for the minor or with whom the minor has lived; or

The county guardian.

The court may disregard an individual who has preference and appoint a person who has a lower preference or no preference. In determining what is in the best interest of the minor, the court may take into account any facts and circumstances presented to it, including the statement of a minor who is under 14 years of age.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Cross references.

Jurisdiction of courts to appoint guardian of child, §

15-11-6

.

Appointment of guardian ad litem in probate proceedings, § 53-3-19 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Provision that surviving spouse under 18 years may take share of estate without intervention of guardian, § 53-4-2(3) (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For article, “Trusts for Dependents: Effect of Georgia’s Support Obligation on Federal Income Taxation,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 323 (1972).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-3-8.
Petition for appointment of conservator for minor; requirements of petition; notice.

Any person may file a petition for the appointment of a conservator of a minor.

The petition for appointment of a conservator shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and date of birth of the minor;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the minor, if any, and, if different from the petitioner, the name, address, and county of domicile of the person nominated by the petitioner to serve as conservator and that person’s relationship to the minor, if any;

Whether to the petitioner’s knowledge there exists any notarized or witnessed document made by a parent of the minor that deals with the conservatorship of the minor and the name and address of any designee named in the document;

In addition to the petitioner and the nominated conservator, the names and addresses of the following relatives of the minor whose whereabouts are known:

Any parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If there is no parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated, the adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be listed;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be listed; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1;

A description of all known assets, income, other sources of funds, liabilities, and expenses of the minor;

A disclosure of any financial interest that would cause the proposed conservator to have a conflict of interest with the minor;

A specific listing of any of the additional powers, as described in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-3-22, that are requested by the conservator and a statement of the circumstances that would justify the granting of such powers; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for appointment of conservator of a minor in the event full particulars are lacking.

Notice of the petition for appointment of a conservator for a minor shall be given to any designee named in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section and the individuals named in paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section. The notice shall be by personal service if the individual resides in this state at a known current address; by first-class mail if the individual resides outside this state at a known address; or by publication for two weeks in the official county legal organ for the county in which the petition is filed if no address is known. The notice shall state that the individual is entitled to object either to the establishment of a conservatorship or to the selection of the petitioner as conservator, or both. The notice shall require that any objection be filed in writing with the court within ten days of the personal service, within 14 days of the date of the mailing of the notice, or within ten days of the date of the second publication of the notice.

If the judge deems it necessary, a temporary conservator may be appointed under the same rules that apply to the appointment of a temporary administrator as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 6 of Title 53.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-3-9.
Hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a conservator of a minor and the giving of notice, the court may hold a hearing and the standard for determination for all matters at issue shall be the best interest of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-10.
Requirements of order granting conservatorship; required filing of certificate.

An order granting conservatorship shall specify:

The name of the conservator and the basis for the selection;

A specific listing of any of the additional powers, as described in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-3-22 that are granted to the conservator;

If a guardian is also appointed and if the guardian and conservator are not the same person, the reasonable sums or property to be provided to the guardian to provide adequately for the minor’s support, care, education, health, and welfare, subject to modification by subsequent order of the court;

If the minor has an interest in real property, the name of the county in which the real property is located; and

Such other and further provisions of the conservatorship as the court shall determine to be in the best interest of the minor, stating the reasons therefor.

In any case involving the appointment of a conservator, if the minor has an interest in real property, the court shall file, within 30 days of granting the petition for conservatorship, a certificate with the clerk of the superior court of each county in this state in which the minor owns real property, which shall be recorded in the deed records of the county and indexed under the name of the minor in the grantor index. The certificate shall set forth the name of the minor, the expiration date of the conservatorship, the date of the order granting the conservatorship, and the name of the conservator. The certificate shall be accompanied by the same fee required for filing deeds with the clerk of the superior court. The filing fee and any fee for the certificate shall be taxed as costs to the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.